New Jersey, session 222, A231.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Homeschool Parents Bill of Rights." 2.    The Legislature finds and declares that the homeschool parent or guardian has a fundamental right to direct the education of their child and that nothing shall infringe upon that right. 3.  Every parent or guardian in this State shall have the right to direct the education of their child in the privacy and comfort of their own home.  Every homeschool parent or guardian shall have the right to: a. provide an individualized education to their child that is based on the childs strengths and weaknesses; b. choose who will teach their child; c. allow their child to explore academic subjects and topics of their own interest while maintaining sole authority over the childs curriculum; d. provide a nurturing and safe educational environment in such manner as the parent or guardian believes is appropriate; and e. provide instruction at a pace, and using an approach, that suits their childs best interests, and which is determined solely by the parent or guardian. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.